Maryland, session 2025, HB1319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
7–111.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “OWNER” MEANS A PERSON WHO HAS A LAWFUL INTEREST IN OR
IS IN LAWFUL POSSESSION OF POINTS.
(3) (I) “POINTS” MEANS A TYPE OF CURRENCY EARNED BY A
CUSTOMER OF A BUSINESS BY COMPLETING REQUIREMENTS SET BY THE BUSINESS
THAT THE CUSTOMER MAY REDEEM FOR BENEFITS, GOODS, OR SERVICES.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1319*

HOUSE BILL 1319
(II) “POINTS” INCLUDES:
1. RETAIL CREDIT;
2. CREDIT CARD POINTS;
3. TRAVEL POINTS; AND
4. FREQUENT FLYER MILES.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY OR WILLFULLY OBTAIN OR EXERT
UNAUTHORIZED CONTROL OVER POINTS WITH THE INTENT TO DEPRIVE THE OWNER
OF THE POINTS.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION:
(1) IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR BOTH; AND
(2) SHALL PAY THE OWNER THE VALUE OF THE POINTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.